Florida, session 2026, SB224.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 627.72612, Florida Statutes, is created 12 to read: 13 627.72612âProhibited rating factors.âAn insurer providing 14 automobile liability coverage may not establish or maintain 15 rates or rating classifications for automobile insurance based 16 on any of the following: 17 (1)âSex. 18 (2)âMarital status. 19 (3)âHome ownership. 20 (4)âEducational level. 21 (5)âOccupation. 22 (6)âThe postal zone in which the insured resides. 23 (7)âCredit score. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.